Texas statutes.
SPECIAL DISTRICT LOCAL LAWS CODE

TITLE 6. WATER AND WASTEWATER

SUBTITLE C. SPECIAL UTILITY DISTRICTS

CHAPTER 7215. MARILEE SPECIAL UTILITY DISTRICT

SUBCHAPTER A. GENERAL PROVISIONS

Sec. 7215.001. DEFINITION. In this chapter, "district" means the Marilee Special Utility District.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 980 (H.B. 2055), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2013.

SUBCHAPTER B. BONDS

Sec. 7215.051. AUTHORITY TO ISSUE BONDS. (a) The district has the rights, powers, duties, and obligations of an issuer under Chapter 1371, Government Code.

(b) Sections 49.181 and 49.182, Water Code, do not apply to the district.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 980 (H.B. 2055), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2013.